District of Columbia statutes.
44-151.12

Investigations and subpoenas.

For the purposes of any investigation or proceeding under this chapter, any person may be required or permitted by the Commissioner to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise, as to any of the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated.

History

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-270, § 112, 52 DCR 799